Illinois, session 104th, HB4803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Electric Transmission Colocation and Siting Priority Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions.As used in this Section:7    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.8    "Department" means the Illinois Department of 9Transportation.10    "Electric transmission facility" means an electrical 11transmission system designed and constructed with the 12capability of being safely and reliably energized at 69 13kilovolts or more, including transmission lines, transmission 14towers, conductors, insulators, foundations, grounding 15systems, access roads, and all associated transmission 16facilities, including transmission substations. "Electric 17transmission facility" does not include a project located on 18the electric generating side of a facility's point of 19interconnection.20    "Highway" has the meaning given to that term in Section 212-202 of the Illinois Highway Code.22    "High-voltage transmission line" means any line for the 23transmission of electric current with a nominal voltage of at   HB4803- 2 -LRB104 16923 AAS 30337 b1least 115 kilovolts that is colocated longitudinally in a 2public right-of-way or a corridor, including all supporting 3structures and accessories necessary for such line. 4"High-voltage transmission line" does not include any line for 5the transmission of electric current that crosses through but 6is not wholly contained within a State highway right-of-way.7    "Public utility" has the meaning given to that term in 8Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.9    "Public utility corridor" means the land, or interest 10therein, acquired for or devoted to a public utility to place 11and maintain infrastructure for electricity, water, gas, or 12internet service.13    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Transportation.14    "State highway corridor" means the land, or interest 15therein, acquired for or devoted to a State highway.16    "Transmission developer" means any company that (i) has 17been issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity 18in this State that authorizes the company to own and operate an 19electric transmission line and (ii) is a State electric 20utility, as defined in Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities 21Act, or an affiliate of a State electric utility through a 22common ownership structure. 23    Section 10. Electric transmission siting priorities.24    (a) In the siting of new electric transmission facilities, 25including high-voltage transmission lines, available corridors   HB4803- 3 -LRB104 16923 AAS 30337 b1shall be used in the following order of priority:2        (1) Existing public utility corridors.3        (2) State highway corridors.4        (3) New corridors.5    (b) Permitting on the corridors listed in subsection (a) 6shall be done, to the greatest extent possible, in a manner 7that accounts for economic and engineering considerations, the 8reliability of the electric system, and the protection of the 9environment. 10    Section 15. High-voltage transmission line colocation 11requests.12    (a) A public utility or transmission developer may 13construct, place, or maintain a high-voltage transmission line 14on a public right-of-way or along a highway if (i) the public 15utility or transmission developer submits to the Secretary a 16colocation request for the high-voltage transmission line and 17(ii) the Secretary reviews and approves the colocation 18request.19    (b) The Secretary may deny a colocation request under this 20Section if the Secretary determines that the construction, 21placement, or maintenance of a high-voltage transmission line 22on a public right-of-way or along a highway would endanger 23public safety or would interfere with the proper function of 24the highway.25    (c) If the Secretary denies a colocation request under   HB4803- 4 -LRB104 16923 AAS 30337 b1this Section, the Secretary shall submit the reasons for the 2denial to the Director of the Environmental Protection Agency, 3the Executive Director of the Commission, and the Director of 4Commerce and Economic Opportunity within 90 days after the 5issuance of the denial. 6    Section 20. Consultation and constructability report.7    (a) A public utility or transmission developer may submit 8a written request to the Department for an evaluation of the 9corridors described in subsection (a) of Section 10 for 10possible locations for a high-voltage transmission line. 11Within 30 days after receipt of a written request under this 12subsection (a), the Secretary shall assign a project 13coordinator to the request. A project coordinator, upon 14assignment to a request, shall begin the evaluation in 15coordination with the applicable public utility or 16transmission developer.17    (b) The Department shall inform a public utility or 18transmission developer about any of the Department's current 19plans or projects that could impact the public utility's or 20transmission developer's potential construction or placement 21of a high-voltage transmission line within a corridor.22    (c) After an evaluation under subsection (a) identifies an 23acceptable location within a corridor, a public utility or 24transmission developer, in consultation with the Department, 25shall develop a constructability report. The constructability   HB4803- 5 -LRB104 16923 AAS 30337 b1report shall include (i) the terms and conditions for the 2siting of the high-voltage transmission line and (ii) an 3agreed-upon time frame during which the Department may not 4request the relocation of the high-voltage transmission line. 5The Department shall issue a permit to the public utility or 6transmission developer for the use of a public right-of-way 7within the corridor for the siting of a high-voltage 8transmission line only after a constructability report is 9approved by both the Department and the public utility or 10transmission developer.11    (d) A public utility or transmission developer and the 12Department shall follow the terms and conditions of the 13approved constructability report during the planning and 14approval process for the siting of a high-voltage transmission 15line. If the Department requires the relocation of a 16high-voltage transmission line on a public right-of-way by a 17specific date, the Department shall give the applicable public 18utility or transmission developer notice of the required 19relocation no less than 10 years before the date of the 20required relocation. 21    Section 25. Relocation notice and cost responsibility 22    (a) If the Department requires the relocation of a 23high-voltage transmission line during the prohibited time 24frame specified in the constructability report or the 25Department provides notice of the required relocation of a   HB4803- 6 -LRB104 16923 AAS 30337 b1high-voltage transmission line to a public utility or 2transmission developer less than 10 years before the date of 3the required relocation, the Department shall be responsible 4for 75% of the costs incurred by the public utility or 5transmission developer in the relocation of the high-voltage 6transmission line. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on 8January 1, 2027.